Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.110

Application of chapter.

The creation of the office of administrative hearings and the transfer of duties and personnel under this chapter shall not affect the validity of any rule, action, decision, or proceeding held or promulgated by any state agency before July 1, 1982. This chapter applies to hearings occurring after July 1, 1982.

[ 1981 c 67 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.